Vermont, session 2025-2026, H698.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
* * * Education Policy * * *
Sec. 1. REPEALS; EDUCATION POLICY
2025 Acts and Resolves No. 73, Secs. 5 (scale; intent), 6 (16 V.S.A. § 165;
minimum class size standards), 7 (failure to comply with class size
minimums), and 27 (16 V.S.A. § 823) are repealed.
Sec. 2. 16 V.S.A. § 823 is amended to read:
§ 823. ELEMENTARY TUITION
(a) Tuition for elementary students shall be paid by the district in which the
student is a resident. The district shall pay the full tuition charged its students
attending a public elementary school to a receiving school for each resident
student attending the receiving school an amount equal to the base amount
contained in subdivision 4001(16) of this title multiplied by the sum of one and
any weights applicable to the resident student under section 4010 of this title.
If a payment made to a public elementary school is three percent more or less
than the calculated net cost per elementary pupil in the receiving school district
for the year of attendance, the district shall be reimbursed, credited, or
VT LEG #386222 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.698
2026 Page 3 of 29
refunded pursuant to section 836 of this title. Notwithstanding the provisions
of this subsection or of subsection 825(b) of this title, the boards of both the
receiving and sending districts may enter into tuition agreements with terms
differing from the provisions of those subsections, provided that the receiving
district must offer identical terms to all sending districts, and further provided
that the statutory provisions apply to any sending district that declines the
offered terms.
(b) Unless the electorate of a school district authorizes payment of a higher
amount at an annual or special meeting warned for the purpose, the tuition paid
to an approved independent elementary school or an independent school
meeting education quality standards shall not exceed the least of:
(1) the average announced tuition of Vermont union elementary schools
for the year of attendance;
(2) the tuition charged by the approved independent school for the year
of attendance; or
(3) the average per-pupil tuition the district pays for its other resident
elementary students in the year in which the student is enrolled in the approved
independent school Notwithstanding subsection (a) of this section, or any other
provision of law to the contrary, the district shall pay the full tuition charged its
students attending an approved independent school in Vermont functioning as
an approved area career and technical center.
VT LEG #386222 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.698
2026 Page 4 of 29
Sec. 3. 2025 Acts and Resolves No. 73, Sec. 8 is amended to read:
Sec. 8. STATE BOARD OF EDUCATION; RULES; REPORT
(a) Rules.
(1) The On or before July 1, 2027, the State Board of Education shall
initiate rulemaking to amend the Education Quality Standards rule 2000 series,
Agency of Education, Education Quality Standards (22-000-003), pursuant to 3
V.S.A. chapter 25:
(A) on or before August 1, 2026, to ensure compliance with the class
size minimum standards set pursuant to 16 V.S.A. § 165(a)(9); and
(B) on or before July 1, 2027, to adopt standards for statewide
graduation requirements based on standards adopted by the State Board and
recommendations from the Agency of Education, which shall take effect
beginning in the 2027–2028 school year for the graduating class of 2031 and
every graduating class thereafter.
(2) On or before August 1, 2026, the State Board of Education shall
initiate rulemaking to amend the approved independent school rule 2200 series,
Agency of Education, Independent School Program Approval (22-000-004),
pursuant to 3 V.S.A. chapter 25, to require approved independent schools that
intend to accept public tuition to comply with the class size minimum
standards set pursuant to 16 V.S.A. § 165(a)(9). The amendments shall also
create a process for review by the State Board for failure to meet the class size
VT LEG #386222 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.698
2026 Page 5 of 29
minimum requirements and the corresponding actions the Board may take for
such noncompliance; provided, however, that the Board shall provide an
approved independent school a substantially similar opportunity to come into
compliance with class size minimum standards that it would provide to a
public school. [Repealed.]
* * *
Sec. 4. 16 V.S.A. § 828 is amended to read:
§ 828. TUITION TO APPROVED SCHOOLS; AGE; APPEAL
(a) A school district shall not pay the tuition of a student except to:
(1) a public school located in Vermont;
(2) an approved independent school that:
(A) is located in Vermont;
(B) is approved under section 166 of this title on or before July 1,
2025;
(C) is located within either:
(i) a supervisory district that does not operate a public school for
some or all grades as of July 1, 2024; or
(ii) a supervisory union with one or more member school districts
that does not operate a public school for some or all grades as of July 1, 2024;
and
VT LEG #386222 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.698
2026 Page 6 of 29
(D) had at least 25 percent of its student enrollment composed of
students attending on a district-funded tuition basis pursuant to chapter 21 of
this title during the 2023–2024 school year; and
(E) complies with the minimum class size requirements contained in
subdivision 165(a)(9) of this title and State Board rule; provided, however, that
if a school is unable to comply with the class size minimum standards due to
geographic isolation or a school has developed an implementation plan to meet
the class size minimum requirements, the school may ask the State Board to
grant it a waiver from this subdivision (E), which decision shall be final;
[Repealed.]
(3) an independent school meeting education quality standards;
(4) a tutorial program approved by the State Board;
(5) an approved education program;
(6) a public school located in another state; or
(7) a therapeutic approved independent school located in Vermont or
another state or country that is approved under the laws of that state or country.
* * *
Sec. 5. SCHOOL DISTRICT VOTING WARD WORKING GROUP;
CONTRACT AND SOFTWARE APPROPRIATION REVERSION
VT LEG #386222 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.698
2026 Page 7 of 29
To the extent that the funds appropriated in 2025 Acts and Resolves No. 73,
Sec. 4(h) have not been spent upon passage of this act, they shall revert to the
General Fund.
* * * Foundation Formula * * *
Sec. 6. REPEAL; PUPIL WEIGHTING
2025 Acts and Resolves No. 73, Sec. 35 (16 V.S.A. § 4010) is repealed.
Sec. 7. 16 V.S.A. § 4010 is amended to read:
§ 4010. DETERMINATION OF WEIGHTED LONG-TERM MEMBERSHIP
AND PER PUPIL EDUCATION SPENDING EDUCATIONAL
OPPORTUNITY PAYMENT
(a) Definitions. As used in this section:
(1) “EL pupils” means pupils described under section 4013 of this title.
(2) “FPL” means the Federal Poverty Level.
(3) “Weighting categories” means the categories listed under subsection
(b) of this section.
(4) “Child with a disability” means any child in Vermont eligible under
State rules to receive special education who is enrolled in any of kindergarten
through grade 12.
(5) “Disability” means any of the following:
(A) a specific learning disability or a speech or language impairment,
each of which is identified as “Category A”;
VT LEG #386222 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.698
2026 Page 8 of 29
(B) an emotional disturbance, intellectual disability, developmental
delay, or other health impairment, each of which is identified as “Category B”;
or
(C) autism spectrum disorder, deaf-blindness, hearing impairment,
orthopedic impairment, traumatic brain injury, or visual impairment, each of
which is identified as “Category C.”
(6) “English language proficiency level” means each of the English
language proficiency levels published as a standardized measure of academic
language proficiency in WIDA ACCESS for ELLs 2.0 and available to
members of the WIDA consortium of state departments of education.
(7) “Newcomer or SLIFE” means a pupil identified as a New American
or as a student with limited or interrupted formal education.
(b) Determination of average daily membership and weighting categories.
On or before the first day of December during each school year, the Secretary
shall determine the average daily membership, as defined in subdivision
4001(1) of this title, of each school district for the current school year and shall
perform the following tasks.,
(1) Using using average daily membership, list for each school district
the number of:
(A)(1) pupils in prekindergarten;
(B)(2) pupils in kindergarten through grade five;
VT LEG #386222 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.698
2026 Page 9 of 29
(C)(3) pupils in grades six through eight;
(D)(4) pupils in grades nine through 12;
(E)(5) pupils whose families are at or below 185 percent of FPL,
using the highest number of pupils in the district:
(i)(A) that meet this definition under the universal income
declaration form; or
(ii)(B) who are directly certified for free and reduced-priced
meals; and
(F)(6) EL pupils who have been most recently assessed at an English
language proficiency level of:
(A) Level 1;
(B) Level 2 or 3;
(C) Level 4; or
(D) Level 5 or 6;
(7) EL pupils who are identified as Newcomer or SLIFE; and
(8) children with a disability whose disability is identified as:
(A) Category A;
(B) Category B; or
(C) Category C, provided that a child with multiple disabilities shall
be counted solely under this subdivision (C).
VT LEG #386222 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.698
2026 Page 10 of 29
(2)(A) Identify all school districts that have low population density,
measured by the number of persons per square mile residing within the land
area of the geographic boundaries of the district as of July 1 of the year of
determination, equaling:
(i) fewer than 36 persons per square mile;
(ii) 36 or more persons per square mile but fewer than 55 persons
per square mile; or
(iii) 55 or more persons per square mile but fewer than 100
persons per square mile.
(B) Population density data shall be based on the best available U.S.
Census data as provided to the Agency of Education by the Vermont Center for
Geographic Information.
(C) Using average daily membership, list for each school district that
has low population density the number of pupils in each of subdivisions
(A)(i)–(iii) of this subdivision (2).
(3)(A) Identify all school districts that have one or more small schools,
which are schools that have an average two-year enrollment of:
(i) fewer than 100 pupils; or
(ii) 100 or more pupils but fewer than 250 pupils.
(B) As used in subdivision (A) of this subdivision (3), “average two-
year enrollment” means the average enrollment of the two most recently
VT LEG #386222 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.698
2026 Page 11 of 29
completed school years, and “enrollment” means the number of pupils who are
enrolled in a school operated by the district on October 1. A pupil shall be
counted as one whether the pupil is enrolled as a full-time or part-time student.
(C) Using average two-year enrollment, list for each school district
that has a small school the number of pupils in each of subdivisions (A)(i)–(ii)
of this subdivision (3).
(c) Reporting on weighting categories to the Agency of Education. Each
school district shall annually report to the Agency of Education by a date
established by the Agency the information needed in order for the Agency to
compute the weighting categories under subsection (b) of this section for that
district. In order to fulfill this obligation, a school district that pays public
tuition on behalf of a resident student (sending district) to a public school in
another school district, an approved independent school, or an out-of-state
school (each a receiving school) may request the receiving school to collect
this information on the sending district’s resident student, and if requested, the
receiving school shall provide this information to the sending district in a
timely manner.
(d) Determination of weighted long-term membership. For each weighting
category except the small schools weighting category under subdivision (b)(3)
of this section, the Secretary shall compute the weighting count by using the
VT LEG #386222 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.698
2026 Page 12 of 29
long-term membership, as defined in subdivision 4001(7) of this title, in that
category.
(1) The Secretary shall first apply grade level Grade-level weights.
Each pupil included in long-term membership shall count as one, multiplied by
the following amounts receive an additional weighting amount, based on the
pupil’s grade level, of:
(A) prekindergarten—negative 0.54, if the pupil is in
prekindergarten; and
(B) grades six through eight—0.36; and
(C) 0.125, if the pupil is in one of grades nine through 12—0.39.
(2) The Secretary shall next apply a Economic disadvantage weight for
pupils whose family is at or below 185 percent of FPL. Each pupil included in
long-term membership whose family is at or below 185 percent of FPL shall
receive an additional weighting amount of 1.03 1.02.
(3) The Secretary shall next apply a weight for EL pupils EL proficiency
weights. Each EL pupil included in long-term membership shall receive an
additional weighting amount, based on the EL pupil’s English language
proficiency level, of 2.49:
(A) 2.11, if assessed as Level 1;
(B) 1.41, if assessed as Level 2 or 3;
(C) 1.20, if assessed as Level 4; or
VT LEG #386222 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.698
2026 Page 13 of 29
(D) 0.12, if assessed as Level 5 or 6.
(4) The Secretary shall then apply a weight for pupils living in low
population density school districts EL Newcomer/SLIFE weight. Each EL
pupil included in long-term membership residing in a low population density
school district, measured by the number of persons per square mile residing
within the land area of the geographic boundaries of the district as of July 1 of
the year of determination, who is a Newcomer or SLIFE shall receive an
additional weighting amount of: 0.42
(A) 0.15, where the number of persons per square mile is fewer than
36 persons;
(B) 0.12, where the number of persons per square mile is 36 or more
but fewer than 55 persons; or
(C) 0.07, where the number of persons per square mile is 55 or more
but fewer than 100.
(5) The Secretary shall lastly apply a weight for pupils who attend a
small school. If the number of persons per square mile residing within the land
area of the geographic boundaries of a school district as of July 1 of the year of
determination is 55 or fewer, then, for each pupil listed under subdivision
(b)(3)(C) of this section (pupils who attend small schools) Special education
weights. Each child with a disability included in long-term membership shall
VT LEG #386222 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.698
2026 Page 14 of 29
receive an additional weighting amount, based on the categorization of the
child’s disability, of:
(A) where the school has fewer than 100 pupils in average two-year
enrollment, the school district shall receive an additional weighting amount of
0.21 for each pupil included in the small school’s average two-year enrollment
0.79, if the disability is identified as Category A; or
(B) where the small school has 100 or more but fewer than 250
pupils, the school district shall receive an additional weighting amount of 0.07
for each pupil included in the small school’s average two-year enrollment 1.89,
if the disability is identified as Category B; or
(C) 2.49, if the disability is identified as Category C.
(6) A school district’s weighted long-term membership shall equal long-
term membership plus the cumulation of the weights assigned by the Secretary
under this subsection.
(e) Hold harmless. A district’s weighted long-term membership shall in no
case be less than 96 and one-half percent of its actual weighted long-term
membership the previous year prior to making any adjustment under this
subsection.
(f) Determination of per pupil education spending educational opportunity
payment. As soon as reasonably possible after a school district budget is
approved by voters, the Secretary shall determine the per pupil education
VT LEG #386222 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.698
2026 Page 15 of 29
spending for the next fiscal year for the school district. Per pupil education
spending shall equal a school district’s education spending divided by its
weighted long-term membership The Secretary shall determine each school
district’s educational opportunity payment by multiplying the school district’s
weighted long-term membership determined under subsection (d) of this
section by the base amount.
* * *
(h) Updates to weights, base amount, and transportation reimbursement.
On or before January 1, 2027 2026, and on or before January 1 of every fifth
year thereafter, the Agency of Education and the Joint Fiscal Office shall
calculate, based on their consensus view and with the advice and consultation
of a professional judgment panel convened by the Agency, updates to the
weights and the base amount, including any inflationary measure, to account
for cost changes underlying those weights and shall issue a written report on
their work to the House and Senate Committees on Education, the House
Committee on Ways and Means, and the Senate Committee on Finance. The
General Assembly shall update the weights under this section, the base
amount, and transportation reimbursement under section 4016 of this title not
less than every five years and the implementation date for the updated weights
and transportation reimbursement shall be delayed by a year in order to
provide school districts with time to prepare their budgets. Updates to the
VT LEG #386222 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.698
2026 Page 16 of 29
weights may include recalibration, recalculation, adding or eliminating
weights, or any combination of these actions.
Sec. 8. 2025 Acts and Resolves No. 73, Sec. 45a is amended to read:
Sec. 45a. FOUNDATION FORMULA; JOINT FISCAL OFFICE;
REPORT
(a) The Joint Fiscal Office shall contract with one or more contractors with
expertise in Vermont’s education funding system to recommend updates to the
cost-factor foundation formula created by this act to move from special
education weights based on disability categories to a reliance on the provision
of special education services and to update any other weights determined to be
empirically necessary for an adequate and equitable education, taking into
account the cost savings generated by new, larger consolidated school districts.
Additionally, the contractors shall make recommendations regarding the
following:
(1) suitable geographic measures for determining sparsity within the
foundation formula;
(2) whether it costs more to educate a secondary student than an
elementary student in Vermont and, if so, an appropriate weight to capture the
cost differential of educating secondary students; and [Repealed.]
(3) how to account for the provision of career and technical education
within Vermont’s foundation formula.
VT LEG #386222 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.698
2026 Page 17 of 29
(b) The contractors shall submit the foundation formula, analysis of
geographic measures, and the other recommendations required under
subsection (a) of this section, along with a detailed analysis to support the
contractor’s recommendations, to the House Committee on Ways and Means,
the Senate Committee on Finance, and the House and Senate Committees on
Education on or before December 1, 2026.
(c) The sum of $400,000.00 is appropriated to the Joint Fiscal Office from
the General Fund in fiscal year 2026 to hire one or more contractors for the
purposes in subsection (a) of this section.
(d) The contractors shall be required to train the Joint Fiscal Office and the
Agency of Education in the methodologies needed to recalibrate and
recalculate the base and weights in accordance with 16 V.S.A. § 4010(f).
* * * Property Tax Classifications * * *
Sec. 9. REPEALS; PROPERTY TAX CLASSIFICATIONS
2025 Acts and Resolves No. 73, Secs. 47 (32 V.S.A. § 5402), 60 (32 V.S.A.
§ 4152), 61 (32 V.S.A. § 4152a), 61a (property tax classifications; transition;
data collection), 61c (tax classifications; rate multipliers; intent), and 61d
(prospective repeal of tax classifications) are repealed.
VT LEG #386222 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.698
2026 Page 18 of 29
Sec. 10. 32 V.S.A. § 5402 is amended to read:
§ 5402. EDUCATION PROPERTY TAX LIABILITY
(a) A statewide education tax is imposed on all nonhomestead and
homestead property at the following rates:
(1) The tax rate for nonhomestead property shall be $1.59 per $100.00
divided by the statewide adjustment.
(2) The tax rate for homestead property shall be $1.00 multiplied by the
education property tax spending adjustment for the municipality per $100.00 of
equalized education property value as most recently determined under section
5405 of this title. The homestead property tax rate for each municipality that is
a member of a union or unified union school district shall be calculated as
required under subsection (e) of this section. a rate sufficient to cover
expenditures from the Education Fund other than supplemental district
spending, after accounting for forecasted nonproperty tax revenues and any
funds unreserved in the Education Fund following the process under 16 V.S.A.
§ 4032(c). It is the intention of the General Assembly that the statewide
education tax rate under this section shall be adopted for each fiscal year by act
of the General Assembly. If the General Assembly fails to adopt a statewide
education tax rate for a fiscal year, the statewide education tax rate for the
fiscal year shall equal the product of 110 percent and the statewide education
VT LEG #386222 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.698
2026 Page 19 of 29
tax rate for the preceding fiscal year. The statewide education tax rate shall be
adjusted for homestead property and nonhomestead property as follows:
If the tax classification of the then the statewide education tax rate
property subject to taxation is: is multiplied by a factor of:
Homestead 1.0
Nonhomestead 1.0
(b) The statewide education tax shall be calculated as follows:
(1) The Commissioner of Taxes shall determine for each municipality
the education tax rates under subsection (a) of this section divided by the
number resulting from dividing the municipality’s most recent common level
of appraisal by the statewide adjustment. The legislative body in each
municipality shall then bill each property taxpayer at the homestead or
nonhomestead applicable rate determined by the Commissioner under this
subdivision, multiplied by the education property tax grand list value of the
property, properly classified as homestead or nonhomestead property and
without regard to any other tax classification of the property not authorized
under this chapter. Statewide education property tax bills shall show the tax
due and the calculation of the rate determined under subsection (a) of this
section, divided by the number resulting from dividing the municipality’s most
recent common level of appraisal by the statewide adjustment, multiplied by
the current grand list value of the property to be taxed. Statewide education
VT LEG #386222 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.698
2026 Page 20 of 29
property tax bills shall also include language provided by the Commissioner
pursuant to subsection 5405(g) of this title.
(2) Taxes assessed under this section shall be assessed and collected in
the same manner as taxes assessed under chapter 133 of this title with no tax
classification other than as homestead or nonhomestead property those
required by this section; provided, however, that the tax levied under this
chapter shall be billed to each taxpayer by the municipality in a manner that
clearly indicates the tax is separate from any other tax assessed and collected
under chapter 133, including an itemization of the separate taxes due. The bill
may be on a single sheet of paper with the statewide education tax and other
taxes presented separately and side by side.
(3) If a district has not voted a budget by June 30, an interim homestead
education tax shall be imposed at the base rate determined under subdivision
(a)(2) of this section, divided by the number resulting from dividing the
municipality’s most recent common level of appraisal by the statewide
adjustment, but without regard to any spending adjustment under subdivision
5401(13) of this title. Within 30 days after a budget is adopted and the
deadline for reconsideration has passed, the Commissioner shall determine the
municipality’s homestead tax rate as required under subdivision (1) of this
subsection. [Repealed.]
VT LEG #386222 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.698
2026 Page 21 of 29
(c)(1) The treasurer of each municipality shall by December 1 of the year in
which the tax is levied and on June 1 of the following year pay to the State
Treasurer for deposit in the Education Fund one-half of the municipality’s
statewide nonhomestead tax and one-half of the municipality’s homestead
education tax, as determined under subdivision (b)(1) of this section.
(2) The Secretary of Education shall determine each municipality’s net
nonhomestead education tax payment and its net homestead education tax
payment to the State based on grand list information received by the Secretary
not later than the March 15 prior to the June 1 net payment. Payment shall be
accompanied by a return prescribed by the Secretary of Education. Each
municipality may retain 0.225 of one percent of the total education tax
collected, only upon timely remittance of net payment to the State Treasurer or
to the applicable school district or districts. Each municipality may also retain
$15.00 for each late property tax credit claim filed after April 15 and before
September 2, as notified by the Department of Taxes, for the cost of issuing a
new property tax bill.
(d) [Repealed.]
(e) The Commissioner of Taxes shall determine a homestead education tax
rate for each municipality that is a member of a union or unified union school
district as follows:
VT LEG #386222 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.698
2026 Page 22 of 29
(1) For a municipality that is a member of a unified union school
district, use the base rate determined under subdivision (a)(2) of this section
and a spending adjustment under subdivision 5401(13) of this title based upon
the per pupil education spending of the unified union.
(2) For a municipality that is a member of a union school district:
(A) Determine the municipal district homestead tax rate using the
base rate determined under subdivision (a)(2) of this section and a spending
adjustment under subdivision 5401(13) of this title based on the per pupil
education spending in the municipality who attends a school other than the
union school.
(B) Determine the union district homestead tax rate using the base
rate determined under subdivision (a)(2) of this section and a spending
adjustment under subdivision 5401(13) of this title based on the per pupil
education spending of the union school district.
(C) Determine a combined homestead tax rate by calculating the
weighted average of the rates determined under subdivisions (A) and (B) of
this subdivision (2), with weighting based upon the ratio of union school long-
term membership, as defined in 16 V.S.A. § 4001(7), from the member
municipality to total long-term membership of the member municipality; and
the ratio of long-term membership attending a school other than the union
school to total long-term membership of the member municipality. Total long-
VT LEG #386222 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.698
2026 Page 23 of 29
term membership of the member municipality is based on the number of pupils
who are legal residents of the municipality and attending school at public
expense. If necessary, the Commissioner may adopt a rule to clarify and
facilitate implementation of this subsection (e). [Repealed.]
(f)(1) A supplemental district spending tax is imposed on all homestead
and nonhomestead property in each member municipality of a school district
that approves spending pursuant to a budget presented to the voters of a school
district under 16 V.S.A. § 563. The Commissioner of Taxes shall determine
the supplemental district spending tax rate for each school district by dividing
the school district’s per pupil supplemental district spending as certified by the
Secretary of Education by the supplemental district spending yield. The
legislative body in each member municipality shall then bill each property
taxpayer at the rate determined by the Commissioner under this subsection,
divided by the number resulting from dividing the municipality’s most recent
common level of appraisal by the statewide adjustment and multiplied by the
current grand list value of the property to be taxed. The bill shall show the tax
due and the calculation of the rate.
(2) The supplemental district spending tax assessed under this
subsection shall be assessed and collected in the same manner as taxes
assessed under chapter 133 of this title with no tax classification other than as
homestead or nonhomestead property; provided, however, that the tax levied
VT LEG #386222 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.698
2026 Page 24 of 29
under this chapter shall be billed to each taxpayer by the municipality in a
manner that clearly indicates the tax is separate from any other tax assessed
and collected under chapter 133 of this title and the statewide education
property tax under this section, including an itemization of the separate taxes
due. The bill may be on a single sheet of paper with the supplemental district
spending tax, the statewide education tax, and other taxes presented separately
and side by side.
(3) The treasurer of each municipality shall on or before December 1 of
the year in which the tax is levied and on or before June 1 of the following year
pay to the State Treasurer for deposit in the Education Fund one-half of the
municipality’s supplemental district spending tax as determined under
subdivision (1) of this subsection.
(4) The Secretary of Education shall determine each municipality’s net
supplemental district spending tax payment to the State based on grand list
information received by the Secretary not later than the March 15 prior to the
June 1 net payment. Payment shall be accompanied by a return prescribed by
the Secretary of Education. Each municipality may retain 0.225 of one percent
of the total supplemental district spending tax collected, only upon timely
remittance of net payment to the State Treasurer or to the applicable school
district.
VT LEG #386222 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.698
2026 Page 25 of 29
* * * Act 73 Effective Dates * * *
Sec. 11. 2025 Acts and Resolves No. 73, Sec. 70 is amended to read:
Sec. 70. EFFECTIVE DATES
(a) This section and the following sections shall take effect on passage:
(1) Sec. 1 (findings; intent; plan);
(2) Sec. 2 (Commission on the Future of Public Education);
(3) Sec. 3 (School District Redistricting Task Force);
(4) Sec. 4 (School District Voting Ward Working Group);
(5) Sec. 28a (State Board of Education tuition fee rules);
(6) Sec. 32 (Agency of Education transformation support);
(7) Sec. 33 (Agency of Education positions);
(8) Sec. 44 (transportation reimbursement guidelines);
(9) Sec. 45 (inflationary measures; prekindergarten; reports);
(10) Sec. 45a (foundation formula report);
(11) Sec. 45c (Education Fund Advisory Committee; delay);
(12) Sec. 53 (homestead exemption report);
(13) Sec. 61b (property tax classifications implementation report);
(14) Sec. 61c (tax classifications intent); [Deleted.]
(15) Sec. 61d (prospective repeal); [Deleted.]
(16) Sec. 63 (regional assessment district transition; progress report);
(17) Sec. 64 (RAD stakeholder working group);
VT LEG #386222 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.698
2026 Page 26 of 29
(18) Sec. 65 (inadvertently removed language);
(19) Sec. 66 (minimum debt for tax sales);
(20) Sec. 68 (property tax credit late fee); and
(21) Sec. 69 (statewide adjustment correction).
(b) The following sections shall take effect on July 1, 2025:
(1) Sec. 5 (scale; intent); [Deleted.]
(2) Sec. 8 (SBE rules; report);
(3) Sec. 9 (AOE report; school calendar; graduation requirements);
(4) Sec. 10 (SBE rule review; appropriation);
(5) Sec. 14 (16 V.S.A. § 3443);
(6) Sec. 15 (School Construction Advisory Board sunset);
(7) Sec. 21 (16 V.S.A. § 828);
(8) Sec. 22 (tuition transition);
(9) Sec. 23 (state-level governance; intent);
(10) Sec. 24 (16 V.S.A. § 161);
(11) Sec. 25 (SBE appointments transition);
(12) Sec. 26 (16 V.S.A. § 162);
(13) Sec. 29 (special education report);
(14) Sec. 30 (AOE special education strategic plan);
(15) Sec. 31 (AOE position); and
(16) Sec. 67 (PVR hearing officer pay).
VT LEG #386222 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.698
2026 Page 27 of 29
(c) The following sections shall take effect on July 1, 2026:
(1) Sec. 6 (class size minimums); [Deleted.]
(2) Sec. 7 (failure to comply with class size minimums); [Deleted.]
(3) Sec. 12 (school construction policy);
(4) Sec. 13 (16 V.S.A. § 3442);
(5) Sec. 16 (16 V.S.A. § 3444);
(6) Sec. 17 (16 V.S.A. § 3445);
(7) Sec. 18 (16 V.S.A. § 3446);
(8) Sec. 19 (transfer of rulemaking authority); and
(9) Sec. 20 (repeals).
(d) Sec. 48 (December 1 letter) shall take effect on July 1, 2027.
(e) Sec. 61a shall take effect on January 1, 2027, provided that the General
Assembly has enacted new school district boundaries between the enactment
of this act and January 1, 2027. [Deleted.]
(f) The following sections shall take effect on July 1, 2028, provided that
the new school districts contemplated by this act have assumed responsibility
for the education of all resident students and that the expert tasked with
developing a cost-factor foundation formula has provided to the General
Assembly the report pursuant to Sec. 45a to provide the General Assembly an
opportunity to enact legislation in consideration of the report:
(1) In Sec. 27, 16 V.S.A. § 823(a) and (d); [Deleted.]
VT LEG #386222 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.698
2026 Page 28 of 29
(2) Sec. 28 (tuition repeals);
(3) Secs. 34 and 36–43 (transition to cost-factor foundation formula);
(4) Sec. 45b (educational opportunity payment transition);
(5) Secs. 46, 47, 49, and 50 (statewide education tax; supplemental
district spending tax);
(6) Sec. 46a (supplemental district spending tax; cap; transition);
(7) Sec. 48a (tax rate transition);
(8) Secs. 51, 52, and 54–56 (property tax credit repeal; creation of
homestead exemption);
(9) Sec. 57 (Education Fund Advisory Committee; review of foundation
formula); and
(10) Secs. 60 and 61 (property tax classifications). [Deleted.]
(g) In Sec. 27, 16 V.S.A. § 823(b) and (c) shall take effect on July 1, 2028,
provided that the new school districts contemplated by this act have assumed
responsibility for the education of all resident students and that the cost-factor
foundation formula report required pursuant to Sec. 45a contains evidence that
it costs more to educate students in grades nine through 12 but the General
Assembly has failed to enact legislation to add a secondary student weight.
[Deleted.]
(h) Sec. 62 (regional assessment districts) shall take effect on January 1,
2029.
VT LEG #386222 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.698
2026 Page 29 of 29
* * * Effective Dates * * *
Sec. 12. EFFECTIVE DATES
(a) This section and Secs. 1 (repeals; education policy), 3 (2025 Acts and
Resolves No. 73, Sec. 8(a)), 4 (16 V.S.A. § 828), 5 (voting ward appropriation
reversion), 6 (repeal; pupil weighting), 8 (2025 Acts and Resolves No. 73, Sec.
45a(a)(2)), 9 (repeals; property tax classification), and 11 (2025 Acts and
Resolves No. 73, Sec. 70) shall take effect on passage.
(b) Secs. 2 (16 V.S.A. § 823; tuition), 7 (16 V.S.A. § 4010; determination
of weighted long-term membership and educational opportunity payment), and
10 (32 V.S.A. § 5402; education property tax liability) shall take effect on July
1, 2028.
VT LEG #386222 v.3